Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-432
Buildings; elevating machines or hoists; signals.

If elevating machines or hoisting apparatus, operated or controlled by other than hand power, are used in the construction, alteration or removal of any building or other structure, a complete and adequate system of communication by means of signals shall be provided and maintained by the owner, contractor or subcontractor, during the use and operation of such elevating machines or hoisting apparatus.

Laws 1911, c. 65, § 8, p. 294;

R.S.1913, § 3609;

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. IV, art. IV, § 28, p. 566;

C.S.1922, § 7709;

C.S.1929, § 48-428;

R.S.1943, § 48-432.